en: textured soy protein, texturised soya protein
cs: texturovaná sojová bílkovina
de: texturiertes Sojaprotein, texturiertes Sojaeiweiss
es: proteina de soja texturizada, proteína texturizada de soja
fr: protéine de soja texturisée, protéines de soja texturées
hr: teksturirani sojin protein
it: proteine di soia testurizzate
pl: teksturowane białko sojowe, teksturat białka sojowego, teksturowane białko sojowe

en: rehydrated soy protein
bg: рехидратиран соев протеин
de: Rehydriertes Sojaprotein, rehydriertes Sojaproteinisolat, angerührtes Sojaproteinisolat
es: Proteina de soya rehidratada
fi: uudelleen hydratoitu soijaproteiini
fr: protéines de soja réhydratées, protéines végétales de soja réhydratées, textures de soja réhydratées
hr: rehidrirani protein soje
hu: rehidratált szójafehérje
it: proteine di soia reidratate
nl: gerehydrateerd soja-eiwit, gerehydrateerde soja-eiwit
sv: rehydrerat sojaprotein

en: soy protein isolate, soya protein isolate, isolated soy protein
cs: izolovaná sojová bílkovina
de: Sojaproteinisolat, Sojaeiweißisolat
es: Aislado de proteína de soja
fi: soijaproteiini-isolaatti
fr: isolat de protéine de soja
hr: izolat proteina soje, izolat sojinih bjelančevina
it: proteine isolate di soia, proteine di soia isolate
pl: izolowane białko sojowe, izolat białka sojowego, izolat sojowy
ru: изолированный белок сои

en: hydrolysed soy protein, hydrolyzed soy protein
bg: хидролизиран соев протеин, хидролизат на соев протеин
da: hydrolyseret sojaprotein
de: Sojaproteinhydrolysat
es: proteína de soja hidrolizada
fi: soijaproteiinihydrolysaatti
fr: protéine de soja hydrolysée, protéines de soja hydrolysées
hu: hidrolizált szójafehérje
it: proteine di soia idrolizzate
nl: gehydroliseerd soja-eiwit, gehydrolyseerd soja-eiwit
pl: hydrolizat białka sojowego, hydrolizowane białko sojowe
sv: hydrolyserat sojaprotein

en: cereal protein
it: proteine dei cereali
nl: graneneiwit

en: wheat protein
bg: пшеничен протеин
ca: proteïna de blat
cs: pšeničná bílkovina, pšeničná bilkovina
de: Weizenprotein, Weizeneiweiß, Weizeneiweiss, Weizen eiweiß
es: Proteina de trigo
fi: vehnäproteiini
fr: protéine de blé, protéines de blé, protéines de froment
hr: protein pšenice
hu: búzafehérje
it: proteine del grano
ja: 小麦たん白
nl: tarwe-eiwit, tarwe-eiwitten
pl: białko pszenne, białko pszenicy
pt: proteína de trigo
sv: veteprotein

en: wheat protein isolate, isolated wheat protein
de: Weizenproteinisolat, isoliertes Weizenprotein
it: proteine del grano isolate

en: rehydrated wheat protein
de: rehydriertes Weizenprotein
fi: vedellä turvotettu vehnäproteiini
fr: protéines de blé réhydratees, protéine de blé réhydratees
hr: rehidrirani pšenični protein
it: proteine del grano reidratate
nl: gerehydrateerd tarwe-eiwit
sv: rehydrerat veteprotein

en: textured wheat protein, textured wheat gluten
da: textureret hvedeprotein
de: Texturiertes Weizenprotein
es: proteína de trigo texturizada
fr: protéines de blé texturées
hr: teksturirani pšenični protein
it: proteine del grano testurizzate
nl: getextuurd tarwe-eiwit, getextureerd tarwe-eiwit
pl: teksturat białek pszenicy, teksturowane białko pszenne, teksturowane białko pszenicy, teksturowany gluten pszenny

en: hydrolyzed wheat protein
da: hydrolyseret hvedeprotein
de: hydrolisiertes Weizenprotein
es: proteína hidrolizada de trigo
fi: vehnäproteiinihydrolysaatti
fr: protéine de blé hydrolysée, protéines de blé hydrolysées
hr: hidrolizirani pšenični protein
hu: hidrolizált búzafehérje
it: proteine del grano idrolizzate
nl: gehydroliseerd tarwe-eiwit, gehydrolyseerd tarweeiwit, gehydrolyseerde tarwe-eiwitten
pl: hydrolizat białka pszenicy, hydrolizowane białko pszenne

en: corn protein
da: majsprotein
eo: maizproteino
fr: protéine de maïs
pt: proteína de milho
sv: majsprotein

en: hydrolysed corn protein
de: Maisproteinhydrolysat
es: proteína de maíz hidrolizada
fi: hydrolysoitu maissiproteiini, maissiproteiinihydrosylaatti
fr: protéine de maïs hydrolysée
hr: hidrolizirane bjelančevine kukuruza
hu: hidrolizált kukoricafehérje
it: Proteine di mais idrolizzate
nl: gehydroliseerd maïseiwit, gehydrolyseerd mais-eiwit, gehydrolyseerd maïseiwit
pl: hydrolizat białka kukurydzy, hydrolizat białka kukurydzianego, hydrolizowane białko kukurydziane
pt: proteína de milho hidrolisada
sv: hydrolyserat majsprotein

en: animal protein
bg: животински протеин
ca: Proteïna animal, proteïnes animals
cs: Živočišné bílkoviny
da: animalsk protein
de: tierisches Eiweiß
es: proteína animal
fi: eläinproteiini
fr: Protéine animale
he: חלבון מן החי, חלבון מן החיות
hr: životinjske bjelančevine
hu: állati fehérje, állati fehérjék
it: proteina animale
ja: 動物性蛋白
lv: dzīvnieku olbaltumvielas
nl: dierlijk proteine
pl: białko zwierzęce, białka zwierzęce
pt: Proteína animal
ro: Proteina animala
ru: животный белок
sv: animaliskt nötprotein

en: blood proteins
de: Bluteiweiß, Bluteiweißstoffe
es: proteínas de sangre, proteínas sanguíneas
fi: veriproteiinit
fr: protéines de sang
hr: proteini krvi
hu: vérfehérjék
it: proteine del sangue

en: pork protein
bg: свински протеин, свински белтък
cs: vepřová bílkovina
de: Schweineprotein
es: proteina de cerdo
fi: sianlihaproteiini
fr: Protéines de porc
hr: svinjske bjelančevine
hu: sertésfehérje, sertéshúsfehérje, sertés fehérje
it: proteina di maiale
nl: varkenseiwit
pl: białko wieprzowe, białka zwierzęce wieprzowe
ro: proteină de porc, proteina de porc
sv: grisköttprotein, animaliskt protein av gris

en: pork collagen protein
it: proteine del collagene di maiale
pl: białko wieprzowe kolagenowe, białko kolagenowe wieprzowe, białka kolagenowe wieprzowe, kolagenowe białko wieprzowe

en: beef protein
bg: говежди протеин, говежди белтък
de: Rindeiweiß
fi: naudanlihaproteiini, naudan proteiini
fr: Protéine de bœuf
hr: goveđi protein
hu: marhafehérje
it: proteine del manzo, proteine di manzo
pl: białko wołowe

en: beef collagen protein
it: proteine del collagene di manzo
pl: białko wołowe kolagenowe, białko kolagenowe wołowe, białka kolagenowe wołowe, kolagenowe białko wołowe

en: hydrolised animal protein, animal hydrolysed proteins
bg: хидролизиран животински протеин
de: Hydrolisiertes Tierprotein
fi: eläinproteiinihydrolysaatti, eläinproteiinihydrolysaatit
fr: protéines animales hydrolysées, protéine animale hydrolysée
hr: hidrolizirani životinjski protein
hu: hidrolizált állati fehérje, hidrolizált állati fehérjék
it: proteine animali idrolizzate

de: hydrolysiertes Schweineprotein
en: hydrolyzed pork protein
bg: хидролизиран свински протеин
es: proteína de cerdo hidrolizada
fr: protéine de porc hydrolysée
hr: hidrolizirani svinjski protein
hu: hidrolizált sertésfehérje
nl: gehydroliseerd varkenseiwit